Missouri, session 2026, HB3408.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 620.430, to read as follows:
620.430. 1. There is hereby established the designation of "Missouri Rock Island
Trail Community" for municipalities located along the Rock Island Trail corridor that
promote outdoor recreation, heritage tourism, and economic development within this
state.
2. The following municipalities are hereby designated as Missouri Rock Island
Trail communities:
(1) The City of Bland; and
(2) The City of Belle.
3. Additional municipalities located along the Rock Island Trail corridor may be
designated as Missouri Rock Island Trail Communities by act of the general assembly.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the expenditure of state
funds.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.